Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202660-1411.01
Administration and enforcement expenses; how paid; fees; licenses; expiration.

(1) To pay the expenses of the administration, operation, maintenance, and enforcement of the Motor Vehicle Industry Regulation Act, the board shall collect with each application for each class of license fees not exceeding the following amounts:

(a) Motor vehicle dealer's license, one thousand dollars;

(b) Supplemental motor vehicle dealer's license, five hundred dollars;

(c) Dealer's agent license, five hundred dollars;

(d) Motor vehicle, motorcycle, or trailer manufacturer's license, one thousand five hundred dollars;

(e) Distributor's license, one thousand five hundred dollars;

(f) Factory representative's license, one hundred dollars;

(g) Distributor representative's license, one hundred dollars;

(h) Finance company's license, one thousand dollars;

(i) Wrecker or salvage dealer's license, five hundred dollars;

(j) Factory branch license, five hundred dollars;

(k) Motorcycle dealer's license, one thousand dollars;

(l) Motor vehicle auction dealer's license, one thousand dollars; and

(m) Trailer dealer's license, one thousand dollars.

(2) The fees shall be fixed by the board and shall not exceed the amount actually necessary to sustain the administration, operation, maintenance, and enforcement of the act.

(3) Such licenses, if issued, shall expire on December 31 next following the date of the issuance thereof. Any motor vehicle, motorcycle, or trailer dealer changing its location shall not be required to obtain a new license if the new location is within the same city limits or county, all requirements of law are complied with, and a fee of one hundred dollars is paid, but any change of ownership of any licensee shall require a new application for a license and a new license. Change of name of licensee without change of ownership shall require the licensee to obtain a new license and pay a fee of fifty dollars. Applications shall be made each year for a new or renewal license. If the applicant is an individual, the application shall include the applicant's social security number.

Laws 1971, LB 768, § 11;

Laws 1972, LB 1335, § 8;

Laws 1974, LB 754, § 9;

Laws 1978, LB 248, § 7;

Laws 1984, LB 825, § 16;

Laws 1997, LB 752, § 147;

Laws 1998, LB 903, § 4;

Laws 1999, LB 632, § 3;

Laws 2003, LB 498, § 7;

Laws 2007, LB681, § 1;

Laws 2010, LB816, § 66;

Laws 2017, LB346, § 8;

Laws 2026, LB972, § 67.
July 18, 2026